New York, session 2025-2026, A809.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 819 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 819. Instruction in financial and insurance literacy. 1. The commis- 4 sioner shall develop and adopt curriculum standards for instruction in 5 financial and insurance literacy to be completed by students enrolled in 6 secondary school. Upon the effective date of this section, each local 7 board of education shall require all students in grades nine through 8 twelve, as a condition of graduation, to complete at least a half-credit 9 course in financial and insurance literacy which implements the minimum 10 course of instruction standards established pursuant to this section. 11 2. Such standards shall include but not be limited to instruction in 12 core competencies of money management and investment and basic princi- 13 ples of personal insurance policies and retirement planning. Such 14 instruction may be provided in the context of existing coursework 15 offered by a local school system and shall be eligible to count toward a 16 mathematics, social studies or elective unit of credit requirement for 17 graduation. Subject to state-appropriated funding, local school boards 18 may provide a unit of study related to financial and insurance literacy 19 separate from existing coursework. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00337-01-5